Oklahoma, session 2025, SB655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 525 of Title 40, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Taxpayer and Citizen Protection Act”.





Req. No. 1340 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 525.1 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Employee” means any person who supplies labor for


remuneration to his or her employer in this state;


2. “Employer” means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,


association, nonprofit organization, or public employer, which has


one or more employees within this state, or which has offered or may


offer employment to one or more individuals in this state;


3. “Employment verification” or “E-Verify” means the electronic


verification system operated by the United States Citizenship and


Immigration Services, or its successor program, as authorized by the


Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996,


P.L. No. 104-208, 8 U.S.C., Section 1324a; and


4. “Unauthorized worker” means the same as defined in 8 U.S.C.,


Section 1324a(h)(3).


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 525.2 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as otherwise provided in subsection B of this


section, all employers shall:


1. Register and create an E-Verify employer account;



Req. No. 1340 Page 2


2. After hiring an employee, employ the new employee


provisionally until the new employee’s work authorization has been


verified. An employer shall submit a new employee’s name and


information for verification even if the new employee’s employment


is terminated less than three (3) business days after becoming


employed;


3. Not employ an employee upon notice of failure of


verification from E-Verify; and


4. Keep a record of the verification for the duration of the


employee’s employment with the employer or for a minimum of three


(3) years, whichever is longer.


B. An employer shall not be required to comply with the


provisions of subsection A of this section, if:


1. An employee was hired by the employer before the effective


date of this act; or


2. The employer is not required to verify the employee’s status


to work pursuant to federal law.


C. An employer shall not employ any employee defined as an


unauthorized worker as defined in Section 2 of this act. An


employer shall be in violation of this section upon failure to


follow the provisions of this section.


D. Nothing in this act shall absolve an employer’s obligation


to comply with federal immigration laws, including the completion



Req. No. 1340 Page 3


and maintenance of federal employment verification forms or


documents.


E. An employer who terminates an employee in order to comply


with the provisions of this act shall not be subject to a civil


action for wrongful termination of the employee as otherwise


provided by law.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 525.3 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Office of the Attorney General shall establish a system


for accepting complaints for individuals in violation of Section 3


of this act. The Attorney General shall not require personal


identifying information to be presented on the complaint by the


complainant. A complainant shall submit the complaint to the


Attorney General. The Attorney General shall investigate any


violation alleged in the complaint submitted to the Office of the


Attorney General.


1. At his or her discretion, the Attorney General may


investigate a complaint submitted by an anonymous complainant.


2. The Office of the Attorney General shall not investigate any


complaint filed based on race, color, national origin, or any other


discriminatory factors as may be prescribed in Section 1301 et seq.


of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 1340 Page 4


B. If the Office of the Attorney General conducts an


investigation pursuant to this section and determines that


reasonable evidence exists that an employer violated the provisions


of this act, the Attorney General shall:


1. Provide notice of the alleged violation to the employer and


provide the employer with an opportunity to comment;


2. For a first violation or a violation involving a single


unauthorized worker, issue a formal warning letter to the employer


and cease the investigation upon determination by the Attorney


General that the employer presented proof of correction;


3. For a second violation or a violation involving two or more


unauthorized workers, order the employer to pay a fine of Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per violation; and


4. For a third or subsequent violation, order the employer to


pay a fine of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation and


institute proceedings before a court to suspend or revoke any


licenses issued by the state to the employer.


C. An employer assessed a fine pursuant to this section may


appeal the determination in court but shall pay an appeal bond equal


to the amount of the fine being appealed. If the employer is found


successful in his or her appeal by the court, the bond shall be


released, and the violation shall not be recorded.


D. The Attorney General shall bring proper action against an


employer who fails to pay the fine or fails to appeal the assessment

Req. No. 1340 Page 5


pursuant to this act. If a court determines that the employer is


liable, the court may assess a fine greater than previously assessed


by the Office of the Attorney General.


E. The Office of the Attorney General shall coordinate with any


applicable agency to maintain a database of employers licensed in


this state that were assessed a fine pursuant to this section. An


employer shall remain in the database for a minimum of one (1) year,


and during that period, the employer shall not be eligible to bid


for or participate in any state contract. After the one-year


period, the employer shall be eligible to bid for and participate in


state contracts following submission by the employer to the Office


of the Attorney General of a sworn affidavit that one (1) year or


more has elapsed since the violation occurred and that the employer


has not violated any provisions of this act during that period.


F. The Attorney General, or his or her inspectors, agents, or


designees, upon proper presentation of credentials to the owner,


manager, or agent of the employer, may enter at reasonable times and


have the right to question either publicly or privately any


employer, owner, manager, agent of the employer, or employees of the


employer and inspect, investigate, reproduce, or photograph any


records relevant to determining compliance with the provisions of


this act. The Attorney General, or his or her inspectors, agents,


or designees shall be required to obtain a warrant or subpoena and


provide proper notice to the owner, manager, or agent of the

Req. No. 1340 Page 6


employer prior to entry to the premises or access to records


relevant to the areas under investigation pursuant to this


subsection. Access to the premises and documentation shall be


limited to the records and areas under investigation pursuant to


violations of this act.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 525.4 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


No city, town, or municipality shall enact an ordinance or


policy, whether written or oral, that limits or otherwise impedes


the efforts of the Office of the Attorney General to enforce the


provisions of this act.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1340 MR 1/19/2025 5:40:48 AM



















Req. No. 1340 Page 7